Wyoming statutes. Title 15 Cities and Towns
Chapter 3 First Class Cities

Cross references. —

As to definition of “first class city,” see §

15-1-101

.

As to powers of cities and towns generally, see §

15-1-103

.

As to annexation, determination of boundaries and addition and exclusion of land, see §§

15-1-401

through

15-1-422

.

As to planning, see §§

15-1-501

to

15-1-512

.

As to zoning, see §§

15-1-601

to

15-1-611

.

For constitutional provisions as to municipal corporations generally, see art. 13, §§ 1 to 5, Wyo. Const.

As to joint city and county buildings, see §

18-2-104

.

For authority of county commissioners to maintain and regulate highway viaducts or subways on any highway including city or town streets within the county, see §

18-4-401

.

For authority of governing body of cities, towns, etc., to establish and maintain recreational facilities and playgrounds, see §§

18-9-201

and

18-9-202

.